California statutes. Public Contract Code
(5) Award shall be made to the qualified proposer whose proposal will be most advantageous to the district with price and other factors considered. If award is not made to the proposer whose proposal contains the lowest price, the district shall make a finding setting forth the basis for the award.

(d) The district may reject any and all proposals and issue a new request for proposals at its discretion.

(e) Upon making an award to a qualified proposer, the district, upon request, shall make available to all other proposers and to the public, an analysis of the award that provides the basis for the selection of that particular qualified proposal.

(f) A person who submits, or who plans to submit, a proposal may protest any acquisition conducted in accordance with this section pursuant to protest procedures established by the board as follows:

(1) Protests based on the content of the request for proposals shall be filed with the district within 10 calendar days after the request for proposals is first advertised in accordance with subdivision (c). The district shall issue a written decision on the protest prior to opening of proposals. A protest may be renewed by refiling the protest with the district within 15 calendar days after the staff recommendation for award has been made available to the public as required by subdivision (e) of Section 20216.

(2) A bidder may protest the recommended award on any ground not based upon the content of the request for proposals by filing a protest with the district within 15 calendar days after the staff recommendation for award has been made available to the public as required by subdivision (e) of Section 20216.

(3) A protest shall contain a full and complete written statement specifying in detail the grounds of the protest and the facts supporting the protest. Protesters shall have an opportunity to appear and be heard before the district prior to the opening of proposals in the case of protests based on the content of the request for proposals, or prior to final award in the case of protests based on other grounds or the renewal of protests based on the content of the request for proposals.

(g) Provisions in a contract concerning women and minority business enterprises, that are in accordance with the request for proposals, shall not be subject to negotiation with the successful bidder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. Golden Empire Transit District [20310. - 20314.]

20310.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Golden Empire Transit District, as provided for in Part 13 (commencing with Section 101000) of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 155, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

20311.

(a) (1) The construction of facilities and works, when the expenditure required exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000), shall be by contract let to the lowest responsible bidder.

(2) Notice requesting bids shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation, which publication shall be made at least 10 days before bids are received. The board may reject any and all bids and readvertise in its discretion.

(3) When the expected procurement required exceeds one thousand dollars ($1,000), the board shall seek a minimum of three quotations, either written or
 oral, which permit prices and other terms to be compared.

(b) (1) The purchase of all supplies, equipment, and materials, when the expenditure required exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), shall be by contract let to the lowest responsible bidder or, in the district’s discretion, to the responsible bidder that submitted a proposal that provides the best value, as defined in paragraph (2), to the district on the basis of the factors identified in the solicitation.

(2) For the purposes of this section, “best value” means the overall combination of quality, price, and other elements of a proposal that, when considered together, provide the greatest overall benefit in response to the requirements described in the solicitation documents.

(3) Notice requesting bids shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation and on the district’s procurement Internet Web site, which publication shall be made at least 10 days before bids are received. The board may reject any and all bids and readvertise in its discretion.

(4) To the extent practicable, when the expected procurement required exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) but does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), the board shall seek a minimum of three quotations, either written or oral, which permit prices and other terms to be compared.

(5) This subdivision applies solely to the procurement of supplies, equipment, and materials and shall not apply to construction
 contracts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 220, Sec. 1.   (SB 1068)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

20312.

If, after rejecting bids, the board determines and declares by a four-fifths vote of all its members that, in its opinion, the supplies, equipment, and materials may be purchased at a lower price in the open market, the board may proceed to purchase the supplies, equipment, and materials in the open market without further observance of the provisions requiring contracts, bids, or notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20313.

In case of an emergency, the board may, by resolution passed by a four-fifths vote of all its members, declare and determine that public interest and necessity demand the immediate expenditure of public money to safeguard life, health, or property, and thereupon proceed to expend, or enter into a contract involving the expenditure of, any sum needed in the emergency without observance of the provisions requiring contracts, bids, or notice. If notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall also comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 2.5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

20314.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 18. Sacramento Regional Transit District [20320. - 20324.]

20320.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Sacramento Regional Transit District, as provided for in Part 14 (commencing with Section 102000) of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20321.

Contracts for the construction of transit works or transit facilities in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder after competitive bidding, except in emergency declared by four-fifths vote of the board of the district. If an emergency is declared and notice for bids to let contracts is not given, the board of the district shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 111, Sec. 1.   (AB 2634)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

20322.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

20323.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the award of purchase contracts by the Sacramento Regional Transit District under competitive bid procedures may not be feasible for products and materials which are undergoing rapid technological changes or for the introduction of new technologies into district operations, and that in these circumstances it is in the public interest to consider the broadest possible range of competing products and materials available, fitness of purpose, manufacturer’s warranty, vendor financing, performance reliability, standardization, life-cycle costs, delivery timetables, support logistics, and other similar factors in addition to price in the award of these contracts.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Board of Directors of the Sacramento Regional Transit District may direct the purchase of (1) computers, telecommunications equipment, fare collection equipment, microwave equipment, and other related electronic equipment and apparatus; (2) specialized rail transit equipment, including, but not limited to, rail cars; and (3) electric powered transit vehicles, by competitive negotiation upon a finding by two-thirds vote of all members of the board of the district that the purchase of that equipment in compliance with provisions of this code generally applicable to the purchase does not constitute a method of procurement adequate for the district’s needs. Competitive negotiations may also be used for the purchase of replacement radio equipment, if the initial purchase of the radio equipment was done by competitive bidding. This section does not apply to contracts for construction or for the procurement of any product available in substantial quantities to the general public.

(c) Competitive negotiation, for the purposes of this section includes, but is not limited to, all of the following requirements:

(1) A request for proposal shall be prepared and submitted to an adequate number of qualified sources, as determined by the district in its discretion, to permit reasonable competition consistent with the nature and requirements of the procurement. In addition, notice of the request for proposal shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation, which publication shall be made at least 10 days before the date for receipt of the proposals. The district shall make every effort to generate the maximum feasible number of proposals from qualified sources and shall make a finding to that effect before proceeding to negotiate if only a single response to the request for proposal is received.

(2) The request for proposal shall identify all significant evaluation factors, including price, and their relative importance.

(3) The district shall provide reasonable procedures for technical evaluation of the proposals received, identification of qualified sources, and selection for contract award.

(4) Prior to making an award, the district shall prepare a price analysis and shall find that the final negotiated price is fair and reasonable based upon comparable procurements in the marketplace.

(5) Award shall be made to the qualified proposer whose proposal will be most advantageous to the district with price and other factors considered. If award is not made to the proposer whose proposal contains the lowest price, the board shall make a finding setting forth the basis for the award.

(d) The district may reject any and all proposals and issue a new request for proposals at its discretion.

(e) Upon making an award to a qualified proposer, the district, upon request, shall make available to all other proposers and to the public, an analysis of the award which provides the basis for the selection of that particular qualified proposal.

(f) A person who submits, or who plans to submit, a proposal may protest any acquisition conducted in accordance with this section as follows:

(1) Protests based on the content of the request for proposals shall be filed with the district within 10 calendar days after the request for proposals is first advertised in accordance with subdivision (c). The district shall issue a written decision on the protest prior to opening of proposals. A protest may be renewed by refiling the protest with the district within 15 calendar days after the mailing of the notice of the recommended award.

(2) Any bidder may protest the recommended award on any ground not based upon the content of the request for proposals by filing a protest with the district within 15 calendar days after the mailing of the notice of the recommended award.

(3) Any protest shall contain a full and complete written statement specifying in detail the grounds of the protest and the facts supporting the protest. Protesters shall have an opportunity to appear and be heard before the board prior to the opening of proposals in the case of protests based on the content of the request for proposals, or prior to final award in the case of protests based on other grounds or the renewal of protests based on the content of the request for proposals.

(g) Provisions in any contract concerning women and minority business enterprises, which provisions are in accordance with the request for proposals, shall not be subject to negotiation with the successful bidder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20324.

Notwithstanding Section 20321, the Board of Directors of the Sacramento Regional Transit District may construct all or any part of the Folsom Corridor Light Rail Extension and Double Tracking Project using a design and construct approach. If the board elects to design and construct the project, it shall comply with all of the following procedures:

(a) A request for qualifications shall be prepared and submitted to an adequate number of sources, as determined by the district, to permit reasonable competition consistent with the nature and requirements of that portion of the extension the district elects to design and construct. In addition, notice of the request for qualifications shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation, at least 10 days before the last date on which responses to the request for qualifications may be received. The request for qualifications shall identify the minimum standards that the district has determined shall be met or exceeded by a contractor to successfully design and construct the project described in this section. Those standards may include, but are not limited to, technical experience and capability, financial condition and capacity, organization, and personnel.

(b) All respondents determined by the district to meet or exceed the minimum standards set forth in the request for qualifications shall be considered prequalified. The district may repeat the prequalification process described in subdivision (a). If the district has prequalified at least three respondents, it may invite those prequalified to submit sealed bids for the project based upon plans and specifications previously prepared by the district. Only those who have been prequalified are eligible for award of a contract. Award shall be made to the prequalified bidder submitting the lowest responsible bid.

(c) The board may reject any and all bids and request new bids.

(d) The board shall not give any special preference in the design and construct bidding process authorized by this section to any contractor or consortium of contractors that worked on the initial designs of the Folsom Corridor Light Rail Extension and Double Tracking Project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 52, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 19. San Mateo County Transit District [20330. - 20332.]

20330.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the San Mateo County Transit District, as provided for in Part 15 (commencing with Section 103000) of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20331.

Contracts for the construction of transit works or transit facilities in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder after competitive bidding, except in emergency declared by the vote of seven members of the board. In the case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 2.6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

20332.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 20. Transit Development Boards [20340. - 20342.]

20340.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board, as provided for in Division 11 (commencing with Section 120000) of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 557, Sec. 1.   Effective October 5, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

20341.

(a) Contracts for construction in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder submitting a responsive bid after competitive bidding, except in emergency declared by the vote of two-thirds of the membership of the board. If the expected construction contract exceeds one thousand dollars ($1,000) and does not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the board shall seek a minimum of three quotations, either written or oral, that permit prices and other terms to be compared, and the board shall award the contract to the bidder who submitted the lowest quotation.

(b) If no bids are received, the project may be performed by a negotiated
 contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 536, Sec. 2.   (AB 1471)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

20342.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the board.

(c) A certified check made payable to the board.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the board.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the board beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 21. North San Diego County Transit Development Board [20350. - 20352.]

20350.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the North San Diego County Transit Development Board, as provided for in Division 11.5 (commencing with Section 125000) of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20351.

(a) Contracts for construction in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder after competitive bidding, except in an emergency declared by the vote of two-thirds of the membership of the board.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the North County Transit District may opt in to the Uniform Public Construction Cost Accounting Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 22000)).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 554, Sec. 1.   (AB 3177)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

20352.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the board.

(c) A certified check made payable to the board.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the board.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the board beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 21.5. Sonoma-Marin Area Rail Transit District [20355. - 20355.7.]

20355.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Sonoma-Marin Area Rail Transit District, as provided for in Part 16 (commencing with Section 105000) of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20355.1.

(a) The purchase of all supplies, equipment, and materials, when the expenditure required exceeds seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000), shall be by contract let to the lowest responsible bidder, or, in the district’s discretion, to the responsible bidder who submitted a proposal that provides the best value to the district on the basis of the factors identified in the solicitation. “Best value” means the overall combination of quality, price, and other elements of a proposal that, when considered together, provide the greatest overall benefit in response to the requirements described in the solicitation documents.

(b) To the extent
 practicable, the district shall obtain a minimum of three quotations, either written or oral, that permit prices and terms to be compared whenever the expected expenditure required for the purchase of supplies, equipment, or materials exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000), but does not exceed seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000).

(c) The construction of facilities and works when the expenditure required exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall be by contract let to the lowest responsible bidder.

(d) Notice requesting bids shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation. This publication shall be made at least 10 days before the bids are received. The district may reject any and all bids and readvertise in its
 discretion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 866, Sec. 1.   (SB 904)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

20355.2.

If after rejecting bids the district determines that the supplies, equipment, and materials may be purchased at a lower price in the open market, the district may proceed to purchase the supplies, equipment, and materials in the open market without further observance of the provisions requiring contracts, bids, or notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20355.3.

In case of an emergency, the board may, by resolution passed by a two-thirds vote of all its members, declare and determine that public interest and necessity demand the immediate expenditure of public money to safeguard life, health, or property, and thereupon proceed to expend or enter into a contract involving the expenditure of any sum needed in the emergency without observance of the provisions requiring contracts, bids, or notice. If notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall also comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20355.4.

(a) Upon determining that immediate remedial measures are necessary to avert or alleviate damage to property of the district or to repair or restore damaged or destroyed property of the district in order to ensure that the facilities of the district are available to serve the transportation needs of the general public, and upon determining that available remedial measures, including procurement in compliance with Sections 20355, 20355.1, 20355.2, and 20355.3 are inadequate, the general manager may authorize the expenditure of money previously appropriated specifically by the board for the direct purchases of goods and services, without observance of the provisions of those sections.

(b) The general manager shall, after any such expenditure, submit to the board a full report explaining the necessity for the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20355.5.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20355.6.

Notwithstanding Section 20355.1, and upon a finding by two-thirds of all members of the board that the proposed purchase in compliance with Sections 20355.1 and 20355.2 does not constitute a method of procurement adequate for the operation of district facilities or equipment, the board may direct the procurement of prototype equipment or modifications in an amount sufficient to conduct and evaluate operational testing without further observance of any provisions requiring contracts, bids, or notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20355.7.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governing board of the Sonoma-Marin Area Rail Transit District may direct the purchase of (1) electronic equipment, including, but not limited to, computers, telecommunications equipment, fare collection equipment, radio and microwave equipment, and other related electronic equipment and apparatus used in rail transit operations; and (2) specialized rail transit equipment, including, but not limited to, rail cars, by competitive negotiation upon a finding by two-thirds of all members of the board that the purchase of that equipment in compliance with provisions of this code generally applicable to the purchase does not constitute a method of procurement adequate for the district’s needs. This section does not apply to contracts for construction or for the procurement of any product available in substantial quantities to the general public.

(b) Competitive negotiation, for the purposes of this section, shall include, as a minimum, all of the following elements:

(1) A request for proposal shall be prepared and submitted to an adequate number of qualified sources, as determined by the district in its discretion, to permit reasonable competition consistent with the nature and requirements of the procurement. In addition, notice of the request for proposal shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation, which publication shall be made at least 10 days before the proposals are received. The district shall make reasonable efforts to generate the maximum feasible number of proposals from qualified sources and shall make a finding to that effect before proceeding to negotiate if only a single response to the request for proposal is received.

(2) The request for proposal shall identify significant evaluation factors, including price, and their relative importance.

(3) The district shall provide reasonable procedures for technical evaluation of the proposals received, identification of qualified sources, and selection for contract award.

(4) The award shall be made to the qualified bidder whose proposal will be most advantageous to the district with price and other factors considered. If the award is not made to the bidder whose proposal contains the lowest price, the board shall make a finding setting forth the basis for the award.

(c) The board may reject any and all proposals and request new proposals at its discretion.

(d) A person who submits, or who plans to submit, a proposal may protest any acquisition conducted in accordance with this section as follows:

(1) Protests based on the content of the request for proposal shall be filed with the district within 10 calendar days after the request for proposal is first advertised in accordance with subdivision (b). The district shall issue a written decision on the protest prior to the opening of proposals. A protest may be renewed by refiling the protest with the district within 15 calendar days after the mailing of the notice of the recommended award.

(2) Any bidder may protest the recommended award on any ground not based upon the content of the request for proposals by filing a protest with the district within 15 calendar days after the mailing of the notice of the recommended award.

(3) Any protest shall contain a full and complete written statement specifying in detail the grounds of the protest and the facts supporting the protest. Protestors shall have an opportunity to appear and be heard before the board prior to the opening of proposals in the case of protests based on the content of the request for proposals, prior to final award in the case of protests based on other grounds or the renewal of protests based on the content of the request for proposals.

(e) Provisions in any contract concerning women and minority business enterprises, which provisions are in accordance with the request for proposals, shall not be subject to negotiation with the successful bidder.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 23. Fresno Metropolitan Transit District [20370. - 20374.]

20370.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Fresno Metropolitan Transit District, as provided for in Chapter 1932 of the Statutes of 1961.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20371.

The purchase of all supplies, equipment and materials, and the construction of facilities and works, when the expenditure required exceeds three thousand dollars ($3,000), shall be by contract let to the lowest responsible bidder. Notice requesting bids shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation, which publication shall be made at least 10 days before bids are received. The board may reject any and all bids and readvertise in its discretion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20372.

If after rejecting bids the board determines and declares by a four-fifths vote of all its members that in its opinion the supplies, equipment and materials may be purchased at a lower price in the open market, the board may proceed to purchase the supplies, equipment and materials in the open market without further observance of the provisions requiring contracts, bids, or notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20373.

In case of any great public calamity, such as an extraordinary fire, flood, storm, epidemic, or other disaster, the board may, by resolution passed by a four-fifths vote of all its members declare and determine that public interest and necessity demand the immediate expenditure of public money to safeguard life, health, or property, and thereupon proceed to expend or enter into a contract involving the expenditure of any sum needed in such emergency without observance of the provisions requiring contracts, bids, or notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20374.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 24. West Bay Rapid Transit Authority [20380. - 20381.]

20380.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the West Bay Rapid Transit Authority, as provided for in Chapter 104 of the Statutes of 1964, First Extraordinary Session.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20381.

The authority may construct the system or any part thereof, and acquire all property necessary therefor on terms and conditions that it deems advisable.

The authority, without awarding a contract for the construction of the system, or any part thereof, may do the work directly and may purchase materials, hire labor, and do all other things necessary for the doing of the work. When any part of the work is to be done or performed by any public body or by the United States jointly or in conjunction with the authority, the portion of the cost thereof to be borne by the authority may be turned over to the government of the United States or to any other public body to be expended by it in the acquisition, construction or completion of the system or any part thereof.

Construction contracts entered into by the authority are not subject to the State Contract Act pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 10100) and shall be governed solely by this act, except that Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 4200) of Division 5 of Title 1 of the Government Code is hereby expressly made applicable to the system, or any part thereof, under this act. Construction contracts may be entered into in the manner and upon terms that the authority deems advisable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 50.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 24.5. Job Order Contracting Procurement by the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority [20385. - 20389.]

20385.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this article, to authorize an alternative and optional procedure for bidding of public works projects that is applicable only to the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority to utilize job order contracts as a delivery method.

(b) The availability of job order contracting as a delivery method for the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority will not preclude the use of traditional delivery methods.

(c) It is the intent of the
 Legislature that job order contracts of the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority be competitively bid and awarded to bidders providing qualified responsive bids.

(d) The Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority should have the authority to use the procurement method outlined in this article for job order contracts, notwithstanding any other applicable procurement requirements.

(e) This article will not affect work that is protected by the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority’s collective bargaining agreements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 87, Sec. 1.   (AB 499)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 20389.)
-------------------------------------------

20385.5.

As used in this article, “Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority” or “authority” means the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority created by Section 130050.2 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 87, Sec. 1.   (AB 499)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 20389.)
-------------------------------------------

20386.

(a) (1) The authority may use the procurement method outlined in this article for job order contracts.

(2) The authority shall not contract for work that is protected by applicable collective bargaining agreements. All job order contracts shall comply with all authority collective bargaining agreements.

(3) Job order contracts of the authority shall be competitively bid and awarded to bidders providing qualified responsive bids.

(4) Job order contracts shall be for repair, remodeling, or other repetitive work to be done according
 to unit prices. No annual contracts may be awarded for any new construction.

(5) A job order contract shall be subject to the project labor agreement between the authority and the Los Angeles/Orange Counties Building and Construction Trades Council, or an amendment or extension of that
 agreement.

(b) Solicitations for job order contracts shall progress as follows:

(1) The authority shall prepare a set of solicitation documents for job order contracts. The documents shall include a unit price catalog or other established unit prices, job order contract terms, job order contract technical specifications, and any other information the authority deems necessary to adequately describe the authority’s needs.

(2) An architect, engineer, consultant, or contractor retained by the authority to assist in the development of the job order contract solicitation documents shall not be eligible to bid or to participate in the preparation of a job order contract bid.

(3) The authority may award multiple job order contracts in response to a single job order contract solicitation.

(c) The authority shall develop a system for evaluating job order contract bids for award of job order contracts.

(d) The award of a job order contract shall progress as follows:

(1) The authority shall prepare a request for bids for job order contracts based on the documents prepared under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) that invites job order contractors to submit sealed bids in the manner prescribed by the authority.

(2) Each bidding job order contractor shall include in its bid one or more
 adjustment factors to the established unit prices provided in the request for bids based on the contract technical specifications.
